South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3445.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-43-220(c)(2)(ii)(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) that neither I, nor a member of my household, other than my spouse, claim the special assessment ratio allowed by this section on another residence." SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies for property tax years beginning after 2025. ----XX----